Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 2

Partition Fences

44-8-201. Partition fence defined — Joining fences.

Partition fences, within the meaning of this part, are fences erected on the line between lands owned by different persons; but no owner of land is compelled to allow a neighbor to join a fence exclusively on that person's own land.

Code 1858, § 1691; Shan., § 2998; Code 1932, § 5213; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1712, 44-9-201.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§44-8-201 —44-8-203, concerning grazing, was transferred to part 5 of this chapter in 1987.

Cross-References. Cattle guards, title 65, ch. 6, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Actions, § 2; 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 31; 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 30; 13 Tenn. Juris., Fences, §§ 2, 22.

44-8-202. Fences to be erected and maintained at joint expense.

Partition fences may be erected and repaired at the expense, jointly, of the occupants or owners; or if a person makes a fence a partition fence, by joining to it or using it as such, that person shall pay to the person erecting it that person's proportion of the expense.

Code 1858, § 1687; Acts 1875, ch. 64, § 1; Shan., § 2999; Code 1932, § 5214; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1713, 44-9-202.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§44-8-201 —44-8-203, concerning grazing, was transferred to part 5 of this chapter in 1987.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Fences, § 2.

44-8-203. Damages for failure to maintain fence.

If either of the persons having a joint or partition fence refuses or neglects to keep that person's part of the fence in good repair, that person shall be liable for all damages the other may sustain to enclosures or crops, by trespassing stock, in consequence of the refusal or neglect.

Acts 1875, ch. 64, § 1; Shan., § 3000; Code 1932, § 5215; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1714, 44-9-203.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§44-8-201 —44-8-203, concerning grazing, was transferred to part 5 of this chapter in 1987.

Cited: Porter v. Poole, 8 Tenn. App. 453, 1928 Tenn. App. LEXIS 161 (1928).

44-8-204. Pay for fence.

If the parties cannot agree as to the amount to be paid to the owner erecting or repairing a partition fence as provided in §§44-8-202 and44-8-206, on application by either to a judge of the court of general sessions, the judge shall issue an order to three (3) disinterested freeholders, not related to either of the parties, to examine such fence, and to ascertain the amount to be paid to the owner erecting or repairing it.

Code 1858, § 1688; Shan., § 3002; mod. Code 1932, § 5221; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1720; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 2; T.C.A., §44-9-204.

44-8-205. Judgment and execution.

The freeholders, first taking an oath before the judge to discharge their duty fairly and impartially, on a day to be by them appointed, of which both parties shall have notice, shall examine the fence, and report to the judge, in writing, the amount to be paid the person erecting it; whereupon, unless the money be paid within ten (10) days thereafter, the judge shall enter up judgment, subject to appeal, and issue execution for the judgment.

Code 1858, § 1689; Shan., § 3003; mod. Code 1932, § 5222; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1721; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 2; T.C.A. §44-9-205.

44-8-206. Rebuilding or repairing fences.

The like proceedings may be had in cases where partition fences are rebuilt or repaired by either of the joint proprietors, the jury of view being judges, in the first instance, of the necessity or advisability of the improvement.

Code 1858, § 1690; Shan., § 3004; mod. Code 1932, § 5223; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1722, 44-9-206.

Cited: Rogers v. Roach, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 402 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 19, 2012).

44-8-207. Fees of court and fence reviewers.

The court is entitled to fifty cents (50¢) for issuing the order, and the fence reviewers to one dollar ($1.00) each, one half (½) of which is to be paid by each party; and, if not paid within ten (10) days after the report, execution shall issue for such amount.

Code 1858, § 1692; Shan., § 3005; Code 1932, § 5224; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1723; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 2; T.C.A., §44-9-207.

44-8-208. Fences not removed without six months' notice.

No partition fence, or any part of a partition fence, shall be removed without the mutual consent of the owners, unless the party desiring to remove the fence, or part of the fence, shall first give six (6) months' notice in writing to the other owner of the owner's intention to remove the fence. After the expiration of the time of the notice, the party may remove the fence, or part of the fence.

Acts 1897, ch. 95, § 1; Shan., § 3005a1; Code 1932, § 5225; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1724, 44-9-208.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Fences, § 2.

44-8-209. Removing fence without notice a misdemeanor — Damages.

Any person who removes a partition fence, or any part of a partition fence, without first giving the notice required by §44-8-208, commits a Class C misdemeanor, and is also liable to the person injured for any damages sustained by reason of the removal.

Acts 1897, ch. 95, § 2; Shan., § 3005a2; mod. Code 1932, § 5226; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1725, 44-9-209; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

44-8-210. Disclaiming responsibility for fence erection — Definitions.

In cases when the property on one (1) side of an existing or proposed partition fence is agricultural land, and the property on the other side is non-agricultural land, the owner of the non-agricultural land may disclaim any responsibility for the erection or maintenance of a partition fence pursuant to § 44-8-202. Such disclaimer shall be in writing, executed by the non-agricultural land owner and mailed to the owner of the agricultural land by registered mail, return receipt requested, or sent by some other means pursuant to which a written verification of receipt is obtained. The disclaimer shall be effective on the date of receipt by the owner of the agricultural land.

Delivery of the disclaimer as described in subsection (a) shall have the effect of:

Relieving the owner of the non-agricultural land of any responsibility to erect or maintain a partition fence pursuant to § 44-8-202; and

Releasing the owner of the agricultural land from any claims by the owner of the non-agricultural land arising out of the non-existence or condition of a partition fence.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agricultural land” has the same meaning as set forth in § 67-5-1004; and

“Non-agricultural land” means land:

That is not agricultural land;

That is the site of a residence; and

On which the owner does not keep livestock.

If property that meets the definition of non-agricultural land at the time of delivery of a disclaimer as described in subsection (a) subsequently ceases to qualify as non-agricultural land, then the disclaimer, and all effects of the disclaimer as described in subsection (b), shall cease to be effective as of the date property ceases to be non-agricultural property.

If a fence is erected by the owner of agricultural land during a period when a disclaimer as described in subsection (a) is in effect, and if the land owned by the disclaiming party subsequently ceases to be qualified as non-agricultural land, then the owner of the non-agricultural land shall reimburse the owner of the agricultural land a proportionate share of the cost of erecting the fence. If the parties cannot agree as to the amount to be paid to the owner of the agricultural land, the process described in § 44-8-204 shall be applicable.

Acts 1999, ch. 266, § 2.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Fences to be erected and maintained at joint expense, §44-8-202.